Washington statutes.
RCW 2.43.050

Oath.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1174-S2.SL) ***

(1) Upon certification or registration with the administrative office of the courts, certified or registered interpreters shall take an oath, affirming that the interpreter will make a true interpretation to the person being examined of all the proceedings in a language which the person understands, and that the interpreter will repeat the statements of the person being examined to the court or agency conducting the proceedings, in the English language, to the best of the interpreter's skill and judgment. The administrative office of the courts shall maintain a record of the oath in the same manner that the list of certified and registered interpreters is maintained.

(2) Before any person serving as an interpreter for the court or agency begins to interpret, the appointing authority shall require the interpreter to state the interpreter's name on the record and whether the interpreter is a certified or registered interpreter. If the interpreter is not a certified or registered interpreter, the interpreter must submit the interpreter's qualifications on the record.

(3) Before beginning to interpret, every interpreter appointed under this chapter shall take an oath unless the interpreter is a certified or registered interpreter who has taken the oath as required in subsection (1) of this section. The oath must affirm that the interpreter will make a true interpretation to the person being examined of all the proceedings in a language which the person understands, and that the interpreter will repeat the statements of the person being examined to the court or agency conducting the proceedings, in the English language, to the best of the interpreter's skill and judgment.

[2017 c 83 s 2; 2010 c 190 s 1; 1989 c 358 s 5. Formerly RCW 2.42.240.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 358: See note following RCW 2.43.010.